Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 2. State Assessments [Repealed]

§§ 39-2-201 and 39-2-202.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4.

§§ 39-2-203 and 39-2-204.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 156, § 1.

§ 39-2-205.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 39-2-206.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 182, § 1.

§§ 39-2-207 through 39-2-214.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4.